Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5526
Qualified employee leasing company, defined.

Qualified employee leasing company means a company which places all employees of a client-lessee on its payroll and leases such employees to the client-lessee on an ongoing basis for a fee and, by written agreement between the employee leasing company and a client-lessee, grants to the client-lessee input into the hiring and firing of the employees.

Laws 2001, LB 620, § 26.